Hawaii, session 2026, GM1221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 206E-281, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "owner-occupied
residential use" to read as follows:
""Owner-occupied residential use" means any use currently
permitted in existing residential zones consistent with owner
occupancy. ["Owner-occupied residential uog" doco not inel-udc
renting—or subleaoing-by^hc owner of a r-eeidcntial- condomi-nium
be—er—subiessee—ef-^afty—kifid-r] "
SECTION 2. Section 206E-283, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t]§206E-283I-3-] Rules; guidelines. [-(-aj-- Reoidential
condominium units within urban r-edevclopment git-eo shall—not be
adverti-sed for rent>—renbedT—or used for-any purpose other-than
owner-oceupied residont-i-al use.-- The authority#—by rule,—shall
cstabl-ish penalfe-ioo for violations of thio oubsoetion up-to and
includi-ng-forced—sale of—a—residential—cendeminium unit within
on urban ■redevelopment oibe a
2026-2542 SB2061 CDl SMA.docx
inniiiiiiinioiiiiiniMiiii

Page 2 2061
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
(a) The design development, and construction
contracts for residential condominium units within an urban
redevelopment site shall not be subject to chapter 103D[—]£
provided that every laborer and mechanic performing work on the
job site for the construction of residential condominium units
shall be paid the prevailing wage established by the director of
labor and industrial relations pursuant to section 104-2.
[(g)] (b) Development should be revenue-neutral to the
greatest extent possible.
[-(-d-b] (c) Urban redevelopment sites shall maximize
walkability."
SECTION 3. Section 206E-284, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
"(a) The authority shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 for the sale of the leasehold interest of residential
condominium units under its control within urban redevelopment
sites; provided that each lease shall be for a term of
ninety-nine years. The rules shall
(1) For the period within sixty days from the initial
o^ferjui2 j regijmre residentda3^condom3jTiium jjnijts j;;[itl^^
2026-2542 SB2061 CDl SMA.docx
miiiiHiiHiniiiiiiiiini

Page 3
S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
the project to be offered only to eligible buyers
pursuant to this subsection for owner-occupied
residential use; provided that the authority:
(A) Shall determine the durational requirements for
owner-occupied residential use; and
(B) May include additional terms, conditions, or
requirements;
(2) Include the following requirements [for-an oligablG
buyer-or owner of a rceadenfe-ial- eondomi-nium uni^] to
be an eligible buyer for purchase of a residential
condominium unit within an urban redevelopment site[-h]
set aside for owner-occupied residential use;
[(Ijj (A) The person shall be a qualified resident of the
State, as defined in section 201H-32 [-t] , except
as otherwise provided by rule;
[4-3-)-] The person shall not use a residential
condominium unit within an urban redevelopment
site for any purpose other than owner-occupied
residential use [•#—aftd], except as otherwise
provided by rule; and
2026-2542 SB2061 GDI SMA.docx
lllllilHIIIIIIIIHIIIIIIIII

Page 4
S.B. NO. S?.
C.D. 1
(4^1 (C) The person [7-] or the person's spouse [7—or any
ethee—peeeeft—tirve—warfeh—felte—ei-tgiteie
buyer or owner,] shall not own any other real
property, including any residential and
non-residential property, beneficial ownership of
trusts, and co-ownership or fractional ownership,
while owning a residential condominium unit
within an urban redevelopment site; provided that
[an -eMGhrblre—bu-yer may- ©wft—real property- up—fee
oix montho afefeer—closing on the -purebase ■ef—a-
reoidenfedal "oondomin-ium -unit within-an urban
-redeveiepmeftfer-eirfee-;—^arevided—furfeber-^feha-fe—an
ewncr efe—a—rea-idential condomfenfeum-unife—w-fefebin an
urban -redcvoiopmont-site in the procoao of
seiiinef—Pbe—reeadenfeiair-eendeminium—unife—may—ewn
et-bcr real property up—fee—ai-x--monfeho-prior-fee
el-eoing on the oalo ef-the residential
condominium unit- t-e -an- cligible -buyer; ] if the
lessee or the lessee's spouse purchases or
acquires any other real property, or becomes a
2026-2542 SB2061 CDl SMA.docx 4

Page 5
S.B. NO. SS.
C.D. 1
beneficiary entitled to occupy property held by a
trust, the eligible buyer shall either;
(i) Sell the leasehold interest in the
residential condominium unit to another
eligible buyer within six months from the
date of purchase or acquisition; or
(ii) Sell or otherwise dispose of the other real
property or divest the beneficiary interest
within six months from the date of purchase
or acquisition;
[provided that the rules adopted purouant to thio oubocction may
require]
(3) Require at least si^t^ per cent of the
residential condominium units be sold to an individual
or household with an income of up to one hundred forty
per cent of the area median income[--- The rules shall
includc]2.
(4) Allow a residential condominium unit that is not
subject to an income restriction under paragraph (3)
and was not sold within sixty days from the initial
offering for sale of the unit to be sold to other
2026-2542 SB2061 GDI SMA.docx
iiiMiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiHii

Page 6
S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
buyers/ as determined by the authority, without an
owner-occupancy requirement; and
(5) Include strict enforcement of owner-occupancy, unless
otherwise exempted by rule, including a prohibition on
renting or subleasing a residential condominium unit
within an urban redevelopment site to any tenant or
sublessee.
The authority may also establish rules for a minimum number of
days residents shall be physically present on the premises and a
maximum number of days non-residents may have access to the
premises."
2. By amending subsection (d) to read:
"(d) An owner of a leasehold interest in the residential
condominium unit within an urban redevelopment site may sell the
owner's leasehold interest in the residential condominium unit;
provided that the authority shall have the right of first
refusal to purchase the leasehold interest in the residential
condominium unit for a certain period of time and for a buyback
price to be determined by the authority ; provided further
that the authority shall establish rules to require buyback
pricing similar to other state agencies' existing pricing
2026-2542 SB2061 GDI SMA.docx
niiDniminiiiiiMiiiiiiiii

Page? S.B. NO.
3^2
C.D. 1
formulas. If the authority does not exercise its right to
purchase the leasehold interest in. the residential condominium
unit, the leasehold interest in the residential condominium unit
may be sold by the owner to an eligible buyer. Upon the death
S of the owner of a leasehold interest in the residential
condominium unit within an urban redevelopment site, the
leasehold interest in the residential condominium unit may be
transferred to the deceased's heir by devise or as any other
real property under existing law; provided that the deceased's
heir shall meet the requirements listed in subsection (a);
provided further that if the deceased's heir does not meet
requirements to accept transfer of the residential condominium
unit, the deceased's heir shall sell the leasehold interest in
the residential condominium unit to an eligible buyer."
SECTION 4. Section 206E-288, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
[ SdSl-- Conotouction - contgaeto.-- Cono-truction
confe-raeto- fer ree-i-dential eondominiam unifo-wi^Lhi-n- an—urbon
rcdovGlepfRon-t oite shall-bo-subject to chapter 103D."]
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2026-2542 SB2061 CDl SMA.docx
HiiiiniiiiiiDiiiiniiig

Page 8 2061
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2542 SB2061 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiMiiiiiii

S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 8th day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2061, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
83-26

SB No. 2061, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives